Mississippi, session 2026, SB2797.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  Legislative Findings and Purpose.  (a)  The Legislature finds that violent crime undermines public safety, erodes trust in the justice system, and imposes significant human and economic costs on victims, families, and communities. (b)  The Legislature further finds that clearance rates, defined as the percentage of reported crimes that are solved through arrest or other lawful means, are a critical measure of whether violent offenders are being held accountable and whether victims receive justice. (c)  Clearance rates for violent crimes have declined significantly over time, weakening deterrence and increasing the likelihood of repeat offending. (d)  Only thirty percent (30%) of violent crimes are cleared in Mississippi, well below the national average of forty-one percent (41%). (e)  Mississippi has one of the highest homicide rates in the country, despite having a lower overall violent crime rate than most other states.  According to FBI data, Mississippi's 2024 murder clearance rate was fifty-two percent (52%). (f)  Low clearance rates send a message that violent crime carries a reduced risk of consequence, thereby endangering public safety. (g)  Mississippi's law enforcement landscape includes a significant number of small and rural agencies that face challenges related to staffing, training, technology, investigative capacity, and data reporting. (h)  Improving violent crime clearance rates requires a coordinated approach that includes effective policing strategies, focused deterrence of high-risk offenders, swift and certain accountability, victim engagement, and evidence-based prevention practices. (i)  The purpose of this act is to establish a task force to examine violent crime clearance rates and recommend policies that improve public safety and justice outcomes. (2)  Creation of the Mississippi Violent Crime Task Force.  There is hereby created the Mississippi Violent Crime Task Force to study violent crime clearance rates and recommend legislative and policy actions to improve the investigation, prosecution, and deterrence of violent crime in Mississippi. (3)  Duties of the Task Force.  The task force shall: (a)  Review violent crime clearance rates statewide and by jurisdiction; (b)  Identify barriers to solving violent crimes, including investigative, technological, staffing, and coordination challenges; (c)  Evaluate evidence-based policing and prosecution strategies that improve violent crime clearance rates; (d)  Examine strategies to identify and supervise high-risk and repeat violent offenders; (e)  Review practices that promote swift and certain accountability for violent crime; (f)  Assess the role of victim engagement and services in improving case outcomes; (g)  Examine the quality, timeliness, and completeness of crime data reporting; (h)  Identify prevention strategies that reduce violent crime and recidivism; and (i)  Develop recommendations for legislative, administrative, and policy changes. (4)  Membership.  The task force shall be composed of the following members: (a)  The Chair of the Senate Judiciary, Division B Committee, or designee; (b)  The Chair of the House Judiciary B Committee, or designee; (c)  The Attorney General of Mississippi, or designee; (d)  The Commissioner of the Mississippi Department of Public Safety, or designee; (e)  The Commissioner of the Mississippi Department of Corrections, or designee; (f)  The Director of the Mississippi Bureau of Investigation, or designee; (g)  One (1) district attorney appointed by the Mississippi Prosecutors Association; (h)  One (1) sheriff appointed by the Mississippi Sheriffs' Association; (i)  One (1) municipal police chief appointed by the Mississippi Association of Chiefs of Police; (j)  One (1) circuit court judge appointed by the Chief Justice of the Mississippi Supreme Court; (k)  One (1) mayor appointed by the Mississippi Municipal League; (l)  One (1) county supervisor appointed by the Mississippi Association of Supervisors; (m)  One (1) representative of a statewide victims' rights organization appointed by the Governor; (n)  One (1) representative of a nonprofit organization with experience in criminal justice policy appointed by the Governor; and (o)  One (1) law enforcement professional appointed by the Governor. (5)  Organization and Administration.  (a) The chair of the Senate Judiciary, Division B Committee and the chair of the House Judiciary B Committee, or their designees, shall serve as co-chairs. (b)  The task force may meet as necessary and may request information from state and local agencies. (c)  Members shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses as provided by law subject to appropriation by the Legislature. (6)  Report.  The task force shall submit a written report to the Legislature no later than December 20, 2026, containing its findings and recommendations. (7)  Continuation. The task force shall continue in existence until otherwise provided by law. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.